Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.340

Time period for completion of sale of all shares of capital stock.

The sale of all shares of capital stock of the converting savings bank to be made under the plan of conversion, including any sale in a public offering or direct community marketing, shall be completed as promptly as possible and within forty-five calendar days after the last day of the subscription period, unless extended by the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 383; 1981 c 85 s 67.]